Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146
Forms; notarized; filing.

The forms provided by sections 43-132, 43-134, 43-143, and 43-145 shall be notarized and filed with the department which shall keep such forms with all other records of an individual adopted person.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 43;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 91.